Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of


Human Services from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2026, the sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the


duties imposed upon the Department of Human Services by law.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1946 JC 3/31/2025 12:08:07 PM

Req. No. 1946 Page 1